Idaho statutes. Title 46 MILITIA AND MILITARY AFFAIRS
Chapter 11 IDAHO CODE OF MILITARY JUSTICE
§ 46-1102. Model State Code of Military Justice.

The “Model State Code of Military Justice” is hereby enacted into law and entered into by this state with any other states legally joining therein in the form substantially as follows:

PART I. GENERAL PROVISIONS

ARTICLE 1. DEFINITIONS — GENDER NEUTRALITY

In this act, unless the context otherwise requires:

The term “cadet,” “candidate,” or “midshipman” means a person who is enrolled in or attending the United States military academy, the United States air force academy, the United States coast guard academy, officer candidate school, a state military academy, a regional training institute, or any other formal education program for the purpose of becoming a commissioned officer in the state military forces;

The term “duty status other than state active duty” means any other type of duty not in federal service and not full-time duty in the active service of the state, under an order issued by authority of law and includes travel to and from such duty;

The term “judge advocate” means a commissioned officer of the organized state military forces who is a member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of a state and is:

Certified or designated as a judge advocate in the judge advocate general’s corps of the army, air force, navy, or the marine corps or designated as a law specialist as an officer of the coast guard, or a reserve component of one of these; or

Certified as a nonfederally recognized judge advocate, under regulations promulgated pursuant to this provision, by the senior judge advocate of the commander of the force in the state military forces of which the accused is a member, as competent to perform such military justice duties required by this code. If there is no such judge advocate available, then such certification may be made by such senior judge advocate of the commander of another force in the state military forces, as the convening authority directs;

“State” means one of the several states, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, Guam, and the U.S. Virgin Islands;

“State active duty” means full-time duty in the state military forces under an order of the governor or otherwise issued by authority of law, and paid by state funds, and includes travel to and from such duty;

“Senior force judge advocate” means the senior judge advocate of the commander of the same force of the state military forces as the accused and who is that commander’s chief legal advisor;

“State military forces” means the national guard of the state of Idaho, as defined in title 32, United States Code, the organized naval militia of the state, and any other military force organized under the constitution and laws of the state of Idaho, not to include the unorganized militia, when not in a status subjecting them to exclusive jurisdiction under 10 U.S.C. chapter 47. The unorganized militia, state defense force, state national guard, home guard or any other name of any state force that does not meet this definition shall not be part of the “state military forces” under this code;

“Senior force commander” means the commander of the same force of the state military forces as the accused;

“Commanding officer” means only commissioned officers;

“Superior commissioned officer” means a commissioned officer superior in rank, grade, or command;

“Military” means any or all of the state military forces;

“Accuser” means a person who signs and swears to charges, any person who directs that charges nominally be signed and sworn to by another, and any other person who has an interest other than an official interest in the prosecution of the accused;

“Military judge” means an official of a general or special court-martial detailed in accordance with article 26;

“Legal officer” means any commissioned officer designated as a judge advocate to perform legal duties for a command;

“Record,” when used in connection with the proceedings of a court-martial, means:

An official written transcript, written summary, or other writing relating to the proceedings; or

An official audiotape, videotape, or similar material from which sound, or sound and visual images, depicting the proceedings may be reproduced;

“Classified information” means:

Any information or material that has been determined by an official of the United States pursuant to law, an executive order, or regulation to require protection against unauthorized disclosure for reasons of national security; and

Any restricted data, as defined in section 11(y) of the atomic energy act of 1954, 42 U.S.C. 2014(y);

“National security” means the national defense and foreign relations of the United States;

“Military offenses” means those offenses prescribed under articles 77 through 117, 123, 124a, 124b, and 131b through 134.

The use of the masculine gender throughout this code shall also include the feminine gender.

ARTICLE 2. PERSONS SUBJECT TO THIS CODE — JURISDICTION

This code applies to all members of the state military forces when serving in a title 32 status or state active duty status as defined in article 1(a)(5) of this code. This code does not apply to members serving in a title 10 status or members of the unorganized militia as defined in section 46-102, Idaho Code.

Subject matter jurisdiction is established if a nexus exists between an offense, either military or nonmilitary, and the state military force, regardless of duty status. Courts-martial convened by the governor or his designated representative have primary jurisdiction of military offenses as defined in article 1(a)(18) of this code. A proper civilian court has primary jurisdiction of a nonmilitary offense when an act or omission violates both this code and local criminal law, foreign or domestic. In such a case, a court-martial may be initiated only after the civilian authority has declined to prosecute or dismissed the charge, provided jeopardy has not attached. Jurisdiction over attempted crimes, conspiracy crimes, solicitation, and accessory crimes must be determined by the underlying offense.
ARTICLE 3. JURISDICTION TO TRY CERTAIN PERSONNEL

(a) Subject to article 43, a person who is in a status in which the person is subject to this chapter and who committed an offense against this chapter while formerly in a status in which the person was subject to this chapter is not relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this chapter for that offense by reason of a termination of that person’s former status.

(b) Each person discharged from the state military forces who is later charged with having fraudulently obtained his discharge is, subject to article 43, subject to trial by court-martial on that charge and is, after apprehension, subject to this chapter while in the custody of the state military forces for that trial. Upon conviction of that charge, he is subject to trial by court-martial for all offenses under this chapter committed before the fraudulent discharge.

(c) No person who has deserted from the state military forces may be relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this chapter by virtue of a separation from any later period of service.

(d) A member of the state military forces who is subject to this chapter is not, by virtue of the termination of a period of active duty for training or inactive-duty training, relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this chapter for an offense against this chapter committed during such period of active duty or inactive-duty training.

No person who has deserted from the state military forces may be relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this chapter by virtue of a separation from any later period of service.

A member of the state military forces who is subject to this chapter is not, by virtue of the termination of a period of active duty for training or inactive-duty training, relieved from amenability to the jurisdiction of this chapter for an offense against this chapter committed during such period of active duty or inactive-duty training.

ARTICLE 4. DISMISSED OFFICER’S RIGHT TO TRIAL BY COURT-MARTIAL

If any commissioned officer, dismissed by order of the governor or his designated representative, makes a written application for trial by court-martial, setting forth, under oath, that he has been wrongfully dismissed, the governor or his designated representative, as soon as practicable, shall convene a general court-martial to try that officer on the charges on which he was dismissed. A court-martial so convened has jurisdiction to try the dismissed officer on those charges, and he shall be considered to have waived the right to plead any statute of limitations applicable to any offense with which he is charged. The court-martial may, as part of its sentence, adjudge the affirmance of the dismissal, but if the court-martial acquits the accused or if the sentence adjudged, as finally approved or affirmed, the adjutant general shall substitute for the dismissal ordered by the governor or his designated representative a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue.

If the governor or his designated representative fails to convene a general court-martial within six (6) months from the presentation of an application for trial under this article, the adjutant general shall substitute for the dismissal ordered by the governor or his designated representative a form of discharge authorized for administrative issue.

If a discharge is substituted for a dismissal under this article, the governor or his designated representative alone may reappoint the officer to such commissioned grade and with such rank as, in the opinion of the governor or his designated representative, that former officer would have attained had he not been dismissed. The reappointment of such a former officer shall be without regard to the existence of a vacancy and shall affect the promotion status of other officers only insofar as the governor or his designated representative may direct. All time between the dismissal and the reappointment shall be considered as actual service for all purposes, including the right to pay and allowances.

If an officer is discharged from any armed force by administrative action or is dropped from the rolls by order of the governor or his designated representative, he has no right to trial under this article.
ARTICLE 5. TERRITORIAL APPLICABILITY OF THE CODE

(a) This code has applicability at all times and in all places subject to the personal jurisdiction as provided in article 2 of this code, or, if not in a duty status, that there is a nexus between the act or omission constituting the offense and the efficient functioning of the state military forces; however, this grant of military jurisdiction shall neither preclude nor limit civilian jurisdiction over an offense, which is limited only by the prohibition of double jeopardy.

(b) Courts-martial and courts of inquiry may be convened and held in units of the state military forces while those units are serving outside the state with the same jurisdiction and powers as to persons subject to this code as if the proceedings were held inside the state, and offenses committed outside the state may be tried and punished either inside or outside the state.

ARTICLE 6. JUDGE ADVOCATES AND LEGAL OFFICERS

The senior force judge advocates in each of the state’s military forces or that judge advocate’s delegates shall make frequent inspections in the field in supervision of the administration of military justice in that force.

Convening authorities shall at all times communicate directly with their staff judge advocates or legal officers in matters relating to the administration of military justice. The staff judge advocate or legal officer of any command is entitled to communicate directly with the staff judge advocate or legal officer of a superior or subordinate command, or with the state judge advocate.

No person who, with respect to a case, serves in a capacity specified in paragraph (2) of this subsection, may later serve as a staff judge advocate or legal officer to any reviewing or convening authority upon the same case.
(c)(1) No person who, with respect to a case, serves in a capacity specified in paragraph (2) of this subsection, may later serve as a staff judge advocate or legal officer to any reviewing or convening authority upon the same case.

The capacities referred to in paragraph (1) of this subsection are, with respect to the case involved, any of the following:

Preliminary hearing officer, court member, military judge, military magistrate, or appellate judge; or

Counsel who have acted in the same case or appeared in any proceeding before a military judge, military magistrate, preliminary hearing officer, or appellate court.

ARTICLE 6A. INVESTIGATION AND DISPOSITION OF MATTERS PERTAINING TO THE FITNESS OF MILITARY JUDGES

The governor or his designee shall prescribe procedures for the investigation and disposition of charges, allegations, or information pertaining to the fitness of a military appellate judge, military judge, or military magistrate to perform the duties of the position involved.

The governor or his designee shall transmit a copy of the procedures prescribed pursuant to this article to the appropriate committees of the Idaho senate and Idaho house of representatives.

ARTICLE 6B. RIGHTS OF THE VICTIM OF AN OFFENSE UNDER THIS CODE

A victim of an offense under this code has the following rights:

The right to be reasonably protected from the accused.

The right to reasonable, accurate, and timely notice of any of the following:

A public hearing concerning the continuation of confinement prior to trial of the accused;

A preliminary hearing under article 32 relating to the offense;

A court-martial relating to the offense;

A public proceeding of the service clemency and parole board relating to the offense; and

The release or escape of the accused, unless such notice may endanger the safety of any person.

The right not to be excluded from any public hearing or proceeding described in paragraph (2) of this subsection unless the military judge or preliminary hearing officer, as applicable, after receiving clear and convincing evidence, determines that testimony by the victim of an offense under this chapter would be materially altered if the victim heard other testimony at that hearing or proceeding.

The right to be reasonably heard at any of the following:

A public hearing concerning the continuation of confinement prior to trial of the accused;

A sentencing hearing relating to the offense; and

A public proceeding of the service clemency and parole board relating to the offense.

The reasonable right to confer with the counsel representing the government at any proceeding described in paragraph (2) of this subsection.

The right to receive restitution as provided in law.

The right to proceedings free from unreasonable delay.

The right to be treated with fairness and with respect for the dignity and privacy of the victim of an offense under this code.

In this article, “victim of an offense under this code” means an individual who has suffered direct physical, emotional, or pecuniary harm as a result of the commission of an offense under this code.

In the case of a victim of an offense under this code who is under eighteen (18) years of age but who is not a member of the state military forces, incompetent, incapacitated, or deceased, the legal guardians of the victim or the representatives of the victim’s estate, family members, or any other person designated as suitable by the military judge, may assume the rights of the victim under this article.

Enforcement by the Idaho state courts:

If the victim of an offense under this chapter believes that an article 32 preliminary hearing ruling or a court-martial ruling violates the rights of the victim afforded by the provisions of this article, including provisions specified in subsection (a)(4) of this article, the victim may petition the Idaho state courts in accordance with the applicable rules of procedure of the Idaho state courts for a writ of mandamus to require the preliminary hearing officer or the court-martial to comply with the provisions of this article.

Paragraph (1) of this subsection applies with respect to the protections afforded by the following:

The provisions of this article;

Military rule of evidence 513, relating to the psychotherapist-patient privilege;

Military rule of evidence 514, relating to the victim advocate-victim privilege; and

Military rule of evidence 615, relating to the exclusion of witnesses.

Upon notice by counsel for the government to counsel for the accused of the name of an alleged victim of an offense under this article who counsel for the government intends to call as a witness at a proceeding under this article, counsel for the accused shall make any request to interview the victim through the special victims’ counsel or other counsel for the victim, if applicable.
(f) If requested by an alleged victim who is subject to a request for interview under subsection (e) of this article, any interview of the victim by counsel for the accused shall take place only in the presence of the counsel for the government, a counsel for the victim, or, if applicable, a victim advocate.

PART II. APPREHENSION AND RESTRAINT

ARTICLE 7. APPREHENSION

Apprehension is the taking of a person into custody.

Any person authorized by this code or by 10 U.S.C. chapter 47, or by regulations issued under either, to apprehend persons subject to this code, any marshal of a court-martial appointed pursuant to the provisions of this code, and any peace officer or civil officer having authority to apprehend offenders under the laws of the United States or of a state, including, but not limited to, section 46-1103, Idaho Code, may do so upon probable cause that an offense has been committed and that the person apprehended committed it.

Commissioned officers, warrant officers, petty officers, and noncommissioned officers have authority to quell quarrels, frays, and disorders among persons subject to this code and to apprehend persons subject to this code who take part therein.

If an offender is apprehended outside the state, the offender’s return to the area must be in accordance with normal extradition procedures or by reciprocal agreement.

No person authorized by this article to apprehend persons subject to this code or the place where such offender is confined, restrained, held, or otherwise housed may require payment of any fee or charge for so receiving, apprehending, confining, restraining, holding, or otherwise housing a person except as otherwise provided by law.

ARTICLE 8. APPREHENSION OF DESERTERS

Any civil officer having authority to apprehend offenders under the laws of the United States or of a state, commonwealth, possession, or the District of Columbia may summarily apprehend a deserter from the state military forces and deliver him into the custody of those forces.

ARTICLE 9. IMPOSITION OF RESTRAINT

Arrest is the restraint of a person by an order, not imposed as a punishment for an offense, directing him to remain within certain specified limits. Confinement is the physical restraint of a person.

An enlisted member may be ordered into arrest or confinement by any commissioned officer by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or through other persons subject to this code. A commanding officer may authorize warrant officers, petty officers, or noncommissioned officers to order enlisted members of the commanding officer’s command or subject to the commanding officer’s authority into arrest or confinement.

A commissioned officer, a warrant officer, or a civilian subject to this code or to trial thereunder may be ordered into arrest or confinement only by a commanding officer to whose authority the person is subject, by an order, oral or written, delivered in person or by another commissioned officer. The authority to order such persons into arrest or confinement may not be delegated.

No person may be ordered into arrest or confinement except for probable cause.

This article does not limit the authority of persons authorized to apprehend offenders to secure the custody of an alleged offender until proper authority may be notified.

ARTICLE 10. RESTRAINT OF PERSONS CHARGED

In general.

Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, any person subject to this chapter who is charged with an offense under this chapter may be ordered into arrest or confinement as the circumstances require.

When a person subject to this chapter is charged only with an offense that is normally tried by summary court-martial, the person ordinarily shall not be ordered into confinement.

Notification to accused and related procedures.

When a person subject to this chapter is ordered into arrest or confinement before trial, immediate steps shall be taken:

To inform the person of the specific offense of which the person is accused; and

To try the person or to dismiss the charges and release the person.

To facilitate compliance with paragraph (1) of this subsection, the governor or his designee shall prescribe regulations setting forth procedures relating to referral for trial, including procedures for prompt forwarding of the charges and specifications and, if applicable, the preliminary hearing report submitted under article 32.

ARTICLE 11. PLACE OF CONFINEMENT — REPORTS AND RECEIVING OF PRISONERS

If a person subject to this code is confined before, during, or after trial, confinement shall be in a civilian or military confinement facility.

No person authorized to receive prisoners pursuant to subsection (a) of this article may refuse to receive or keep any prisoner committed to the person’s charge by a commissioned officer of the state military forces, when the committing officer furnishes a statement, signed by such officer, of the offense charged against the prisoner, unless otherwise authorized by law.

Every person authorized to receive prisoners pursuant to subsection (a) of this article to whose charge a prisoner is committed shall, within twenty-four (24) hours after that commitment or as soon as the person is relieved from guard, report to the commanding officer of the prisoner the name of the prisoner, the offense charged against the prisoner, and the name of the person who ordered or authorized the commitment.

ARTICLE 12. CONFINEMENT WITH ENEMY PRISONERS PROHIBITED

No member of the state military forces may be placed in military confinement in immediate association with enemy prisoners or other foreign nationals not members of the armed forces. This article shall not apply to confinement of state military forces in civilian confinement facilities.

ARTICLE 13. PUNISHMENT PROHIBITED BEFORE TRIAL

No person, while being held for trial or awaiting a verdict, may be subjected to punishment or penalty other than arrest or confinement upon the charges pending against the person, nor shall the arrest or confinement imposed upon such person be any more rigorous than the circumstances required to ensure the person’s presence.
ARTICLE 14. DELIVERY OF OFFENDERS TO CIVIL AUTHORITIES

A person subject to this code accused of an offense against civil authority may be delivered, upon request, to the civil authority for trial or confinement.

When delivery under this article is made to any civil authority of a person undergoing sentence of a court-martial, the delivery, if followed by conviction in a civil tribunal, interrupts the execution of the sentence of the court-martial, and the offender after having answered to the civil authorities for the offense shall, upon the request of competent military authority, be returned to the place of original custody for the completion of the person’s sentence.

PART III. NONJUDICIAL PUNISHMENT

ARTICLE 15. COMMANDING OFFICER’S NONJUDICIAL PUNISHMENT

Under such regulations as prescribed, any commanding officer (and for purposes of this article, officers-in-charge) may impose disciplinary punishments for minor offenses without the intervention of a court-martial pursuant to this article. The governor, the adjutant general, or an officer of a general or flag rank in command may delegate the powers under this article to a principal assistant who is a member of the state military forces.

Any commanding officer may impose upon enlisted members of the officer’s command:

An admonition;

A reprimand;

The withholding of privileges for not more than six (6) months;

The forfeiture of pay of not more than seven (7) days’ pay;

A fine of not more than seven (7) days’ pay;

A reduction to the next inferior pay grade, if the grade from which demoted is within the promotion authority of the officer imposing the reduction or any officer subordinate to the one who imposes the reduction;

Extra duties, including fatigue or other duties, for not more than fourteen (14) days, which need not be consecutive; and

Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than fourteen (14) days, which need not be consecutive.

Any commanding officer of the grade of major or lieutenant commander, or above, may impose upon enlisted members of the officer’s command:

Any punishment authorized in subsection (b)(1), (2) and (3) of this article;

The forfeiture of not more than one-half (½) of one (1) month’s pay per month for two (2) months;

A fine of not more than one (1) month’s pay;

A reduction to the lowest or any intermediate pay grade, if the grade from which demoted is within the promotion authority of the officer imposing the reduction or any officer subordinate to the one who imposes the reduction, but an enlisted member in a pay grade above E-4 may not be reduced more than two (2) pay grades;

Extra duties, including fatigue or other duties, for not more than forty-five (45) days, which need not be consecutive; and
(6) Restriction to certain specified limits, with or without suspension from duty, for not more than sixty (60) days, which need not be consecutive.

The governor, the adjutant general, an officer exercising general court-martial convening authority, or an officer of a general or flag rank in command may impose:

Upon officers of the officer’s command:

Any punishment authorized in subsection (c)(1), (2), (3) and (6) of this article; and

Arrest in quarters for not more than thirty (30) days, which need not be consecutive.

Upon enlisted members of the officer’s command:

Any punishment authorized in subsection (c) of this article.

Whenever any of those punishments are combined to run consecutively, the total length of the combined punishment cannot exceed the authorized duration of the longest punishment in the combination, and there must be an apportionment of punishments so that no single punishment in the combination exceeds its authorized length under this article.

Except in the case of a member attached to or embarked in a vessel, punishment under this article may not be imposed on any member under this article if the member has, before the imposition of such punishment, demanded trial by court-martial in lieu of such punishment.

The officer who imposes the punishment, or the successor in command, may, at any time, suspend, set aside, mitigate, or remit any part or amount of the punishment and restore all rights, privileges, and property affected. The officer also may:

Mitigate reduction in grade to forfeiture of pay;

Mitigate arrest in quarters to restriction; or

Mitigate extra duties to restriction.

A person punished under this article who considers the punishment unjust or disproportionate to the offense may, through the proper channel, appeal to the next superior authority within fifteen (15) days after the punishment is either announced or sent to the accused, as the commander may determine. The appeal shall be promptly forwarded and decided, but the person punished may in the meantime be required to undergo the punishment adjudged. The superior authority may exercise the same powers with respect to the punishment imposed as may be exercised under subsection (g) of this article by the officer who imposed the punishment. Before acting on an appeal from a punishment, the authority that is to act on the appeal may refer the case to a judge advocate for consideration and advice.

The imposition and enforcement of disciplinary punishment under this article for any act or omission is not a bar to trial by court-martial or a civilian court of competent jurisdiction for a serious crime or offense growing out of the same act or omission and not properly punishable under this article; but the fact that a disciplinary punishment has been enforced may be shown by the accused upon trial and, when so shown, it shall be considered in determining the measure of punishment to be adjudged in the event of a finding of guilty.

Whenever a punishment of forfeiture of pay is imposed under this article, the forfeiture may apply to pay accruing before, on, or after the date that punishment is imposed.

Regulations may prescribe the form of records to be kept of proceedings under this article and may prescribe that certain categories of those proceedings shall be in writing.

The mitigated punishment shall not be for a greater period than the punishment mitigated. When mitigating reduction in grade to forfeiture of pay, the amount of the forfeiture shall not be greater than the amount that could have been imposed initially under this article by the officer who imposed the punishment mitigated.

PART IV. COURT-MARTIAL JURISDICTION

ARTICLE 16. COURTS-MARTIAL CLASSIFIED

The three (3) kinds of courts-martial in the state military forces are:

General courts-martial, consisting of:

A military judge and not less than five (5) members; or

Only a military judge, if before the court is assembled the accused, knowing the identity of the military judge and after consultation with defense counsel, requests orally on the record or in writing a court composed only of a military judge and the military judge approves;

Special courts-martial, consisting of:

A military judge and not less than three (3) members; or

Only a military judge, if one has been detailed to the court, and the accused under the same conditions as those prescribed in subsection (1)(B) of this article so requests; and

Summary courts-martial, consisting of one (1) commissioned officer.

ARTICLE 17. JURISDICTION OF COURTS-MARTIAL IN GENERAL

Each component of the state military forces has court-martial jurisdiction over all members of the particular component who are subject to this code. Additionally, the army and air national guard state military forces have court-martial jurisdiction over all members subject to this code.

ARTICLE 18. JURISDICTION OF GENERAL COURTS-MARTIAL

Subject to article 17 of this code, general courts-martial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code for any offense made punishable by this code and may, under such limitations as the governor may prescribe, adjudge any punishment not forbidden by this code.

ARTICLE 19. JURISDICTION OF SPECIAL COURTS-MARTIAL

Subject to article 17 of this code, special courts-martial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code for any offense made punishable by this code and may, under such limitations as the governor may prescribe, adjudge any punishment not forbidden by this code except dishonorable discharge, dismissal, confinement for more than one (1) year, forfeiture of pay exceeding two-thirds (2/3) pay per month, or forfeiture of pay for more than one (1) year.

ARTICLE 20. JURISDICTION OF SUMMARY COURTS-MARTIAL

Subject to article 17 of this code, summary courts-martial have jurisdiction to try persons subject to this code, except officers, cadets, candidates, and midshipmen, for any offense made punishable by this code under such limitations as the governor may prescribe.

No person in the rank of E-7 or above may be brought to trial before a summary court-martial if that person objects thereto. If objection to trial by summary court-martial is made by an accused in the rank of E-7 or above, trial by special or general court-martial may be ordered, as may be appropriate. Members in the rank of E-6 and below do not have the right to reject trial before a summary court-martial. Summary courts-martial may, under such limitations as the governor may prescribe, adjudge any punishment not forbidden by this code except dismissal, dishonorable or bad-conduct discharge, confinement for more than one (1) month, restriction to specified limits for more than two (2) months, or forfeiture of more than two-thirds (2/3) of one (1) month’s pay.
(c) A summary court-martial is a noncriminal forum. A finding of guilty at a summary court-martial does not constitute a criminal conviction.

ARTICLE 21. RESERVED

PART V. APPOINTMENT AND COMPOSITION OF COURTS-MARTIAL

ARTICLE 22. WHO MAY CONVENE GENERAL COURTS-MARTIAL

General courts-martial may be convened by:

The governor;

The adjutant general;

The commanding officer of a force of the state military forces;

The commanding officer of a division or a separate brigade; or

The commanding officer of a separate wing.

If any such commanding officer is an accuser, the court shall be convened by superior competent authority and may in any case be convened by such superior authority if considered desirable by such authority.

ARTICLE 23. WHO MAY CONVENE SPECIAL COURTS-MARTIAL

Special courts-martial may be convened by:

Any person who may convene a general court-martial;

The commanding officer of a garrison, fort, post, camp, station, air national guard base, or naval base or station;

The commanding officer of a brigade, regiment, detached battalion, or corresponding unit of the army;

The commanding officer of a wing, group, separate squadron, or corresponding unit of the air force; or

The commanding officer or officer in charge of any other command when empowered by the adjutant general.

If any such officer is an accuser, the court shall be convened by superior competent authority and may in any case be convened by such superior authority if considered desirable by such authority.

ARTICLE 24. WHO MAY CONVENE SUMMARY COURTS-MARTIAL

Summary courts-martial may be convened by:

Any person who may convene a general or special court-martial;

The commanding officer of a detached company or other detachment, or corresponding unit of the army;

The commanding officer of a detached squadron or other detachment, or corresponding unit of the air force; or

The commanding officer or officer in charge of any other command when empowered by the adjutant general.

When only one (1) commissioned officer is present with a command or detachment, that officer shall be the summary court-martial of that command or detachment and shall hear and determine all summary court-martial cases. Summary courts-martial may, however, be convened in any case by superior competent authority if considered desirable by such authority.

ARTICLE 25. WHO MAY SERVE ON COURTS-MARTIAL

Any commissioned officer of the state military forces is eligible to serve on all courts-martial for the trial of any person subject to this code.

Any warrant officer of the state military forces is eligible to serve on general and special courts-martial for the trial of any person subject to this code, other than a commissioned officer.

Any enlisted member of the state military forces is eligible to serve on a general or special court-martial for the trial of any other enlisted member.
(c)(1) Any enlisted member of the state military forces is eligible to serve on a general or special court-martial for the trial of any other enlisted member.

Before a court-martial with a military judge and members is assembled for trial, an enlisted member who is an accused may personally request, orally on the record or in writing, that:

The membership of the court-martial be comprised entirely of officers; or

Enlisted members comprise at least one-third (1/3) of the membership of the court-martial, regardless of whether enlisted members have been detailed to the court-martial.

Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, after such a request, the accused may not be tried by a general or special court-martial if the membership of the court-martial is inconsistent with the request.

If, because of physical conditions or military exigencies, a sufficient number of eligible officers or enlisted members, as the case may be, is not available to carry out the provisions of paragraph (2) of this subsection, the trial may nevertheless be held. In that event, the convening authority shall make a detailed written statement of the reasons for nonavailability. The statement shall be appended to the record.

The accused in a court-martial with a military judge and members may, after the findings are announced and before any matter is presented in the sentencing phase, request, orally on the record or in writing, sentencing by members.
(d)(1) The accused in a court-martial with a military judge and members may, after the findings are announced and before any matter is presented in the sentencing phase, request, orally on the record or in writing, sentencing by members.

The convening authority shall detail not less than the number of members necessary to impanel the court-martial under article 29.

When convening a court-martial, the convening authority shall detail as members thereof such members of the state military forces as, in the convening authority’s opinion, are best qualified for the duty by reason of age, education, training, experience, length of service, and judicial temperament. No member of the state military forces is eligible to serve as a member of a general or special court-martial when that member is the accuser, a witness, or has acted as investigating officer or as counsel in the same case.

Before a court-martial is assembled for the trial of a case, the convening authority may excuse a member of the court from participating in the case. The convening authority may delegate the authority under this subsection to a judge advocate or to any other principal assistant.

ARTICLE 25A. RESERVED

ARTICLE 26. MILITARY JUDGE OF A GENERAL OR SPECIAL COURT-MARTIAL

A military judge shall be detailed to each general and special court-martial.

A military judge shall be:

An active or retired commissioned officer of an organized state military force and qualified, by reason of education, training, experience, and judicial temperament, for duty;

A member in good standing of the bar of the highest court of a state or a member of the bar of a federal court for at least five (5) years;

Certified as a military judge by the senior force judge advocate which is the same force as the accused; and

Certified as qualified, by reason of education, training, experience, and judicial temperament, for duty.

In the instance when a military judge is not a member of the bar of the highest court of the state, the military judge shall be deemed admitted pro hac vice, subject to filing a certificate with the senior force judge advocate which is the same force as the accused setting forth such qualifications provided in subsection (b) of this article.

The military judge of a general or special court-martial shall be designated by the senior force judge advocate which is the same force as the accused, or a designee, for detail by the convening authority. Neither the convening authority nor any staff member of the convening authority shall prepare or review any report concerning the effectiveness, fitness, or efficiency of the military judge so detailed, which relates to performance of duty as a military judge.
